Utah statutes.
46-1-21.   Resignation.

(1)  A notary who resigns a notarial commission shall provide to the lieutenant governor a notice indicating the effective date of resignation.

(2)  A notary who ceases to reside in this state or who becomes unable to read and write as provided in Section 46-1-3 shall resign the commission.

(3)  A notary who resigns shall destroy the official seal and certificate.



Amended by Chapter 136, 2003 General Session

